Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5201
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-5201 to 77-5215 shall be known and may be cited as the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act.

Laws 1999, LB 630, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 990, § 8;

Laws 2008, LB1027, § 2.